Hawaii statutes.
[§58-2] County arborist advisory
committees; establishment. Each county of the State shall establish a
county arborist advisory committee, which shall be appointed by the mayor and
shall include the county planning director, or the director's designee; one
member who shall be actively employed in the practice of landscape
architecture, and not less than three other members selected on the basis of
active participation in programs of community beautification, or research or
organization in the ecological sciences, including ethnobotany, or Hawaiiana.
[L 1975, c 105, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next